Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1203
Social services; provided or purchased; dependent children and families; aged, blind, or disabled persons.

Social services shall be provided or purchased for dependent children and families, aged persons, blind individuals, and disabled individuals as defined by state law and to former and potential recipients as defined in federal regulations.

Laws 1973, LB 511, § 3.